src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/V-T-A-ihtsiipi_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Verb - ihtsiipi - ok : # -m animate transitive verb, bring to town AEW NA1
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kitsstsiipioo
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: nitsstsiipiaawa
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+1Sg+4SgO: nitsstsiipiaayini
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kitsstsiipiooki
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kitsstsiipiaawa
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+2Sg+4SgO: kitsstsiipiaayini
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+3Sg+1SgO: nitsstsiipiooka
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+3Sg+2SgO: kitsstsiipiooka
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+3Sg+4SgO: ihtsiipiyiiwa
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+4Sg+3SgO: otsstsiipiooka
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+4Sg+2SgO: kitsstsiipiookini
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+4Sg+1SgO: nitsstsiipiookini
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+4Pl+5Sg/PlO: ihtsiipiyiiyi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4SgO: otsstsiipiookini
     
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO: kitsstsiipioohpinnaana
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: nitsstsiipiaannaani
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+1Pl+4PlO: nitsstsiipiaannaani
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+21Pl+3PlO: ihtsiipiaayi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+21Pl+4PlO: ihtsiipiaayi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: kitsstsiipiookihpinnaana
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO: kitsstsiipiaawaayi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+2Pl+4PlO: kitsstsiipiaawaayi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+3Pl+1PlO: nitsstsiipiookinnaani
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+3Pl+2PlO: kitsstsiipiookoaayi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+3Pl+4PlO: ihtsiipiyiiyi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+4Pl+1PlO: nitsstsiipiookinnaani
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+4Pl+2PlO: kitsstsiipiookoaayi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+4Pl+3PlO: otsstsiipiookoaayi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+4Pl+5Sg/PlO: ihtsiipiyiiyi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4PlO: otsstsiipiookoaayini
 
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+Unspec+1SgO: nitsstsiipiookoo
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+Unspec+1PlO: nitsstsiipiootsspinnaana
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+Unspec+2SgO: kitsstsiipiookoo
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+Unspec+2PlO: kitsstsiipiootsspoaawa
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+Unspec+21PlO: ihtsiipiootssp
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+Unspec+3SgO: ihtsiipiaawa
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+Unspec+3PlO: ihtsiipiaayi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+Unspec+4SgO: ihtsiipiaayini
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Ind+Unspec+4PlO: ihtsiipiaayi

     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: kitsstsiipioohsi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: nitsstsiipiaahsi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+1Sg+4SgO: nitsstsiipiaahsini
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: kitsstsiipiookssi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: kitsstsiipiaahsi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+2Sg+4SgO: kitsstsiipiaahsini
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+3Sg+1SgO: nitsstsiipiyssi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO: kitsstsiipiyssi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+3Sg+4SgO: otsstsiipiaahsi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+4Sg+3SgO: otsstsiipiyssi

     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO: kitsstsiipioohsinnaani
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO: nitsstsiipiaahsinnaani
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+1Pl+4PlO: nitsstsiipiaahsinnaani
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+21Pl+3PlO: ihtsiipiaahsi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+21Pl+4PlO: ihtsiipiaahsi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO: kitsstsiipiookssinnaani
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO: kitsstsiipiaahsoaayi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+2Pl+4PlO: kitsstsiipiaahsoaayi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO: nitsstsiipiyssinnaani
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+21PlO: nitsstsiipiookssi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO: kitsstsiipiyssoaayi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+4PlO: otsstsiipiaahsi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+4Pl+4PlO: otsstsiipiyssi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+4Pl+3PlO: otsstsiipiyssi

     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+1SgO: nitsstsiipiookoohsi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+1PlO: nitsstsiipiootssinnaani
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+2SgO: kitsstsiipiookoohsi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+2PlO: kitsstsiipiootssoaayi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+21PlO: ihtsiipiootssi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+3SgO: ihtsiipiaahsi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+3PlO: ihtsiipiaahsi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+4SgO: ihtsiipiaahsini

     ihtsiipi+VTA+Sbj+1Sg+2SgO: ihtsiipiiniki
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Sbj+1Sg+3SgO: ihtsiipiaainiki
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Sbj+2Sg+1SgO: ihtsiipiookiiniki
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Sbj+2Sg+3SgO: ihtsiipiaainiki
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+1SgO: ihtsiipiootsiiniki
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+2SgO: ihtsiipiootsiiniki
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+4SgO: ihtsiipiaasi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Sbj+4Sg+3SgO: ihtsiipiootsiiniki

     ihtsiipi+VTA+Sbj+1Sg+2PlO: ihtsiipiinoainiki
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Sbj+1Sg+3PlO: ihtsiipiaainiki
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Sbj+2Sg+1PlO: ihtsiipiookinnaaniki
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Sbj+2Sg+3PlO: ihtsiipiaainiki
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+1PlO: ihtsiipiootsiinnaaniki
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+21PlO: ihtsiipiookisi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+2PlO: ihtsiipiootsiinoainiki
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+4PlO: ihtsiipiaasi
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Sbj+4Sg+3PlO: ihtsiipiootsiinoainiki

     ihtsiipi+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+1SgO: ihtsiipiookoiniki
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+1PlO: ihtsiipiookoinnaaniki
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+2SgO: ihtsiipiookoiniki
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+2PlO: ihtsiipiookoinoainiki
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+21PlO: ihtsiipiootsski
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+3SgO: ihtsiipiaahki
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+3PlO: ihtsiipiaahki

     ihtsiipi+VTA+Imp+2Sg+1SgO: ihtsiipiookit
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Imp+2Sg+1PlO: ihtsiipiookinnaana
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Imp+2Sg+3SgO: ihtsiipiis
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Imp+2Sg+3PlO: ihtsiipiis
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Imp+2Pl+1SgO: ihtsiipiookik
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Imp+2Pl+1PlO: ihtsiipiookinnaana
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Imp+2Pl+3SgO: ihtsiipiik
     ihtsiipi+VTA+Imp+2Pl+3PlO: ihtsiipiik

     ihtsiipi+VTA+Der/Rcpr+VAI+Ind+1Pl: [ nitsstsiipiootsiiyihpinnaana , nitsstsiipiootsiiyihpinnaan ]
     
